Washington statutes.
RCW 43.46.040

Compensation—Travel expenses—Organization—Chairperson—Rules—Quorum.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation. However, nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and legislative members shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 44.04.120. The commission shall organize, elect a chairperson annually, and adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. A majority of its members constitute a quorum. Any action as defined in RCW 42.30.020(3) shall be taken only at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

[ 1985 c 317 s 4; 1965 c 8 s 43.46.040. Prior: 1961 c 301 s 4.]